Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1216
Low-income home energy assistance program; allocation of funds.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall annually allocate at least ten percent of available funds for the low-income home energy assistance program established pursuant to the federal Energy Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 8621 to 8630, to weatherization assistance for eligible households as administered by the department or other agencies of the state.

Laws 2021, LB306, § 2.